Wyoming, session 2026, HB0148.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 36-1-101(a) by creating a new
paragraph (ix) and by creating a new subsection (b),
36-5-105(a) and 36-5-114(a) and (d)(intro) are amended to
read:

36-1-101. Definitions.

HB0148

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0390
(a) Unless the context indicates otherwise, as used
in this act:

(ix) "Utility scale industrial project" means
any industrial project on state lands, other than an
industrial project for the production of coal, oil, gas or
other minerals, that includes either or both of the
following:

(A) A total capital cost of not less than
fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000.00);

(B) A total project footprint of not less
than three hundred twenty (320) acres.

(b) The legislature finds that utility scale
industrial projects may create potential risks to the
state's primary economic interests and a rigorous review of
the projects is required prior to approval to ensure the
greatest benefit to state land beneficiaries and to avoid
litigation costs to the state.

HB0148

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0390
36-5-105. Criteria for leasing; preferences;
assignments, subleases or contracts; lands taken for war
purposes; mineral lands excepted; agricultural lands.

(a) All state lands leased by the state board of land
commissioners, for grazing and other agricultural purposes
shall be leased in such manner and to such parties as shall
inure to the greatest benefit to the state land trust
beneficiaries. No lease of state lands for a utility scale
industrial project shall be made without a public hearing
in the county in which the land is located if a hearing is
requested by the county commissioners.

36-5-114. Leasing for industrial, commercial,
residential and recreational purposes; authority; rental
fees; rules and regulations.

(a) The board of land commissioners may lease for a
term of not more than seventy-five (75) years state lands
for industrial, commercial and recreational purposes. No
lease for any utility scale industrial project shall be
authorized or renewed unless:

HB0148

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0390
(i) The lease requires the utility scale
industrial project to implement an aircraft detection
lighting system, if required, that is radar activated to
limit the visual impact of the utility scale industrial
project; and

(ii) Prior to approval of the lease, the board
of land commissioners conducts a written analysis of
potential adverse impacts of the lease on nature based
tourism and on local ad valorem tax revenue from diminished
property values. The written analysis under this subsection
shall include:

(A) Impacts of the lease on viewsheds,
national trails and private property. The analysis of the
impacts on viewsheds under this paragraph shall include a
digital viewshed analysis to determine landscape
compatibility. If the project is found to extend above the
natural horizon line visible from a national historic
trail, the board shall require the applicant to submit a
visual mitigation plan to reduce the visual impacts of the
project prior to any approval of the lease;

HB0148

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0390
(B) A report from the Wyoming game and fish
commission on potential impacts of the lease on critical
big game migration corridors. If the report from the
Wyoming game and fish commission includes a finding of
material concern and the board approves the lease, the
written analysis from the board shall include written
findings of why the lease was approved in consideration of
the findings of the Wyoming game and fish commission;

(C) A summary of testimony submitted by any
county official, including testimony on whether the lease
is consistent with local county land use planning and
zoning or conflicts with any local ordinance;

(D) A summary of testimony submitted by any
adjoining landowner or any property owner who may have a
material adverse impact resulting from the lease. As used
in this subparagraph, "material adverse impact" includes,
but is not limited to, visual impacts that disturb the
natural horizon line from a primary residence or national
historic trail, projected decreases to property value or
other fiscal impacts.

HB0148

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0390
(d) The board shall promulgate rules and regulations
implementing policies, procedures and standards for the
long-term leasing of state lands for industrial, commercial
and recreational purposes under the provisions of W.S.
36-5-114 through 36-5-117, including provisions requiring
compliance with all applicable land use planning and zoning
laws and permitting the board to terminate a lease for good
cause shown. For the long-term leasing of state lands for a
utility scale industrial project, the rules shall require
the lessee to deposit a bond with the office of state lands
and investments for the decommissioning costs associated
with the utility scale industrial project as determined by
the board. When the office of state lands and investments
initiates a request for a proposed leasing of state lands,
the office shall require not less than thirty (30) days
notice be provided:

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0148